South Dakota, session 2026, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The state treasurer shall transfer $1,100,000 from the public buildings fund,
created in § 5-15-29.2 to the capitol restoration fund, created in section 2 of this Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 5-15:
There is created the capitol restoration fund, to be administered by the Bureau of
Human Resources and Administration, for the purpose of restoring, renovating, and
improving the state capitol building.
Expenditures from the fund must be by special appropriation of the Legislature.
Any interest earned on moneys in the fund must remain in the fund.
Section 3. This Act is effective June 29, 2026.

26.833.14 2 119
An Act to create the capitol restoration fund and to transfer moneys thereto.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 119
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 119 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB119 ENROLLED